dictsource/pl_rules
// This file is UTF8 encoded
// Spelling to phoneme words and exceptions for Polish

.L01	ka ki ce kę ką ko kach kom

.L02  c ć cz f h k p s ś sz t   // 'w' is [f] after these consonants

.L03  a i ę ą o

.L04  i  im  imi  ich  iemu  iego


.group	 a
        a          a
        a (_       a_
        ae (_      E
     _) ae (rA     aE
     _) ae         E
    _h) al (l      O
     h) allowee (n_ 'alOwy
     h) allowee (n alOwy
     C) ai (r      E
  _alt) ai (r      ai
    _k) ai (r      ai
     _) approval   apRuval
     _) archie     ERtSi
     _) archie (C  ERtS|;E
        acku (p    Eka
     _) arcy (@P4t aRtsy
     _) assistant  asistant

    @ł) a (by_     =a
    @ł) a (bym_    =a
    @ł) a (byś_    =a

     @) a (łby_    =a
     @) a (łbym_   =a
     @) a (łbyś_   =a

.group	 ą
        ą          O~
        ą (_       O~_
        ą (_A      O~_
        ą (p       Om
        ą (b       Om
        ą (t       On
        ą (c       On
        ą (d       On
        ą (ć       On^
        ą (dź      On^
        ą (ci      On^
        ą (dzi     On^
        ą (k       ON
        ą (g       ON
        ą (l       O
        ą (ł       O

.group	 b
    @@) borg (_S4t bOrg
    @@) berg (_S4t bErg
    @@) börg (_S4t bErg
    @@) børg (_S4t bErg

        b          b
    ja) bł (kA     p
        b (_       p
        b (i       b;
     _) backup     bEkap
     _) beatles    b;itEls
        bi (A      b;j

.group	 c
        c          ts
    vA) c          k
     _) c (abernet k
        c (acie_   k
   _ar) c (adia_   k
   _ar) c (adii_   k
   _ar) c (adio_   k
   _ar) c (adią_   k
   _ar) c (adię_   k
     _) c (alend   k
        cal (l     kO
        cal (lA    ka
        c (alv     k
        caly (ps   kali
     _) ca (m      kE
     _) c (amembert ka
     _) c (an      k
  cose) c (ans     k
     _) c (app     k
     _) c (aps_    k
     _) c (apslo   k
     _) c (arav    k
     _) c (arl     k
     _) c (arp     k
     _) c (art     k
     _) c (arv     k
        casc       kask
        cast       kast
        c (at_     k
        c (ata_    k
        c (atami_  k
        c (atem_   k
        c (ato_    k
        c (atom_   k
   _mo) cc (A      k
        cc (acie_  k
        cc (atA    k
        cc (at_    k
        cc (ata_   k
        cc (atami_ k
        cc (atem_  k
        cc (ato_   k
        cc (atom_  k
        cc (i_     tS
        cc (ia_    tS
        cc (ich_   tS
        cc (iego_  tS
        cc (iem_   tS
        cc (iemu_  tS
        cc (iie_   tS
        cc (im_    tS
        cc (imi_   tS
        cc (ina_   tS
        cc (inem_  tS
        cc (inie_  tS
        cc (ino_   tS
        cc (io_    tS
    vi) c (e       ts
        ch         x
    vA) ch         tS
     _) challeng (er tSElEndZ
        cha (mpi   tZE
        chan (nel  tSa
     _) charle (s  tSaRls
     _) ch (atow   tS
     _) ch (atuj   tS
        ch (err    S
        ch (ev     S
        chi (A     x;
        chi (C     x;i
     _) chic (agA  Sik
     _) chie (f    tSi
     _) ch (ip+    tS
     _) chippendal (A tSipEndEjl
     _) chopi (n   SOpE
     _) chow (der  tSaw
     _) ch (risto  k
     _) chrome (go xrOmE
     _) chrome     xrOm
        c (i       ts;
        ci (A      ts;
    ar) ci (L03_   sij
    li) ci (L03_   sj
     A) ci (ana_   sj
     A) ci (anem_  sj
     A) ci (anie_  sj
     A) ci (ano_   sj
     A) ci (anowi_ sj
     _) cic (eron  tSitS
     _) c (iner    s
     _) c (ir      ts
    ti) ck         k
    ti) c          k
    vA) ck         k
   _de) ck         k
   _ro) ck (A      k
    lo) ck (_      k
    lo) ck (a_     k
    lo) ck (iem_   k
    lo) ck (u_     k
     A) cker       kER
     _) c (lA      k
     _) clea (C    kli
        c (lip     k
     _) cloch (ard klOS
     _) clois (o   kluaz
     _) clow (n    klaw
  _dis) c (o       k
     _) coach      kOwtS
     _) cock       kOk
  _lin) c (oln     k
     _) c (om      k
     _) c (omber   ts
     _) c (ombrA   ts
     _) c (omies   ts
     _) c (ominu   ts
     _) c (onC     k
     _) conc (ert  kOntS
        c (orow    k
        core       kOr
     _) copywri (t kOpyRaj
   _de) c (o       k
   _re) c (o       k
     _) c (orC     k
        c (osecans k
        c (osin    k
        c (otang   k
     _) c (owbo    k
     _) c (r       k
        crack      kRak
    _s) creenrea (d kRinRi
        cresc (end kREStS
     _) croiss     kRruas
        c (s       k
    di) c (tA      k
     _) c (umul    k
     _) curie      kiRi
     _) cu (rli    kE
        cz         tS


.group	 ć
        ć          ts;
        ć (b       dz;
        ć (g       dz;

.group	 d
        d          d
        d (_       t
        d (i       d;
        di (A      dj
        dies (lA   d;iz
        dies (el   d;iz
     a) dd (_      d
     a) dd (on     d
     _) deadlin    dEdlajn
     _) deadline   dEdlajn
     _) deadline (C dEdlajne
        dz         dz
        dz (_      ts
        dz (i      dz;
        dzi (A     dz;
   _na) dzi (em    d|Z;
   _po) dzi (em    d|Z;
        dź         dz;
        dź (_      ts;
        dż         dZ
        dż (_      tS

    bu) dż (et     d|Z
    _o) dż         d|Z
   _po) dż         d|Z
 _mena) dż (er     dZ
   _na) dż         d|Z
 _pona) dż         d|Z


.group	dg
   _na) dg         dg
   _po) dg         dg
    _o) dg         dg
  prze) dg         dg
 _popo) dg         dg
 _pona) dg         dg
  _poo) dg         dg
_niena) dg         dg
 _nieo) dg         dg
_niepo) dg         dg
_niepona) dg       dg
_niepopo) dg       dg
_niepoo) dg        dg
        dge (_     dZ
        dg         dZ


.group	 e
        e          E
     i) e (_       E#

     @) e (Cłbym_  =E
     @) e (Cłbyś_  =E
     @) e (Cłby_   =E
    _s) ec (ond    'Ek

     _) ei (C      aj
   _kl) ei (n      aj

        e (_A      E_
        ee (n      i
        ee (p      i
     s) ee         i
    _C) ee (_      i
    _C) ea (_      i
    sp) ea (k      i
     d) ea (ler    i
     l) eas (in    iz
    _l) ea (d      i
     h) eavy (K    Evi
    _h) ea (d      E
    _h) ea (le     i
     r) ea (gan    E
     r) eality (_  i'Elity
     t) ea (tr     Ea
     t) ea         i
    sp) eech       itS
        eu (tsch   Oj

     _) email      imEjl


.group	 ę
        ę          E~
        ę (_       E
        ę (_A      E_
        ę (p       Em
        ę (b       Em
        ę (t       En
        ę (c       En
        ę (d       En
        ęć (dzie   En^
        ę (dzi     En^
        ę (ci      En^
        ę (ć       En^
        ę (si      En^
        ę (ś       En^
        ę (dź      En^
        ę (k       EN
        ę (g       EN
        ę (l       E
        ę (ł       E
     i) ę (tna     E

.group	 f
        f          f
        fi (A      f;j

.group	 g
        g          g
        g (i       g;
        gg         g
    hi) gi (e      gj
        g (_       k
        gł (_      gw
        gh         g
        gate (s    gEjt
     _) gentleman  dZEntElmEn
     _) georgi (L03_ dZORdZj

.group	 h
        h          x
        h (A       h
        A) h       h
        hi (A      h;
        hi (C      h;i
        hu (b      xa

.group	 i
        i          i
        i (A_+     j
     A) i (A       j
     C) i (A       ;

   _kl) i (e       ;ij
    żm) ii (_      iji
   rak) ii (_      iji
    _f) ire (fox_  'ajER
    _f) ire (fo    ajER
    _m) ic (ro     ajk
    _p) i (per     aj
   _pr) i (mary    'aj
   _pr) i (mie     'aj
   _pr) ime        'ajm

     C) ie (_      ;E#
    _t) ime        ajm
    _t) ime (r     ajmE
   _dr) i (v       aj


   _ep) i (L01     =i
 _rytm) i (L01_    =i
 _term) i (L01_    =i

_domin) i (kom_++  i
_domin) i (kach_++ i
_domin) i (ko_++   i
_domin) i (ką_++   i
_domin) i (kę_++   i
_domin) i (ce_++   i
_domin) i (ki_++   i
_domin) i (ka_++   i
_weron) i (kom_++  i
_weron) i (kach_++ i
_weron) i (ko_++   i
_weron) i (ką_++   i
_weron) i (kę_++   i
_weron) i (ce_++   i
_weron) i (ki_++   i
_weron) i (ka_++   i

  _ton) i (ka_     =i
  _ton) i (ki_     =i
  _ton) i (kach_   =i
tekton) i (ka_     =i
tekton) i (ki_     =i
tekton) i (kach_   =i
 taton) i (ka_     =i
 taton) i (ki_     =i
 taton) i (kach_   =i
   ton) i (ce_     =i
   ton) i (kę_     =i
   ton) i (ką_     =i
   ton) i (ko_     =i

  @alm) i (L01_    =i
  @aul) i (L01_    =i
  @bol) i (L01_    =i
  @cha) i (L01_    =i
  @chn) i (L01_    =i
  @cyf) i (L01_    =i
  @eon) i (L01_    =i
  @epl) i (L01_    =i
  @erm) i (L01_    =i
  @ero) i (L01_    =i
  @fon) i (L01_    =i
  @gan) i (L01_    =i
  @gen) i (L01_    =i
  @gog) i (L01_    =i
  @han) i (L01_    =i
  @hol) i (L01_    =i
  @ion) i (L01_    =i
  @ipp) i (L01_    =i
  @jsm) i (L01_    =i
  @kom) i (L01_    =i
  @lab) i (L01_    =i
  @law) i (L01_    =i
  @lem) i (L01_    =i
  @lif) i (L01_    =i
  @lin) i (L01_    =i
   log) i (L01_    =i
   mim) i (L01_    =i
  @mon) i (L01_    =i
  @mun) i (L01_    =i
  @nam) i (L01_    =i
  @nem) i (L01_    =i
  @nim) i (L01_    =i
  @nom) i (L01_    =i
  @non) i (L01_    =i
  @orm) i (L01_    =i
  @oza) i (L01_    =i
  @pon) i (L01_    =i
  @raf) i (L01_    =i
  @rag) i (L01_    =i
  @ram) i (L01_    =i
  @rof) i (L01_    =i
  @rom) i (L01_    =i
  @ron) i (L01_    =i
  @rop) i (L01_    =i
  @sem) i (L01_    =i
  @tal) i (L01_    =i
  @tan) i (L01_    =i
  @uan) i (L01_    =i
  @ubl) i (L01_    =i
  @uda) i (L01_    =i
  @urg) i (L01_    =i
  @ych) i (L01_    =i
  @ykl) i (L01_    =i
  @ytm) i (L01_    =i

        i (łby_    =i
        i (łbym_   =i
        i (łbyś_   =i
    @l) i (by_     =i
    @n) i (by_     =i
    @l) i (śmy_    =i
    @n) i (ście_   =i
    @l) i (ście_   =i

     @) i (byśmy_  =i
     @) i (byście_ =i

    @C) ie (libyśmy_ =;E
    @C) ie (libyście_ =;E
    @C) ie (liby_  =;E

    @C) ia (łybyśmy_ =;a
    @C) ia (łybyście_ =;a
    @C) ia (łyby_  =;a

.group	 j
        jazz       dZEz
        jazz (_    dZEs
        j          j

     _) james      dZEjms
     _) jamesi (e_ dZEjmS;
        joggin     dZOg;iN
     _) john       dZOn
     _) johni (e   dZOn^;
     _) j (im      dZ
     _) j (imen    h
     _) jack (_    dZEk
     _) jack (s    dZEk
     _) jacky (_   dZEki
     _) jack (y    dZEk
        jea (ns    dZi
     _) jeff       dZEf
     _) jirami (_  dZiRami
     _) jirze (_   dZiZE
     _) jir        dZiR
     _) jonath     dZOnat
     _) jacques    Zak

.group	 k
        k          k
//		k	(i	c
        kł (_      kw
//		ki	(A	kj
     _) klow (n    klaw

.group	 l
        l          l
        l (_       l_
        li (A      lj
   _po) li (A      li

.group	 ł
        ł          w
     A) ł (_       w_
   mys) ł (_       w_
        ł (_ 

     @) łbym (_S1  m         // reduce entries in pl_list (jonsd)
     @) łbyś (_S1  S;

.group	 m
        m          m
        m (_       m_
     A) mi (A      mj
  _zie) mi (A      m;
     _) meeting (A mit;iNg
     _) meeting (C mit;iNk
     _) meeting    mit;iNg
     _) mj (rA     majO
     _) mc (P2t    mEk

.group	 n
    @A) nton (_S4t ntOn
    @A) ngton (_S5t NgtOn
        n          n
        n (_       n_
        n (i       n^
        ni (A      n^;
        A) n (k    N
        A) n (g    N
     a) ng (el     ndZ
        n (ć       n^
        n (ci      n^
        n (dź      n^
        n (dzi     n^
        noff (_S4t nOv
        noff (om_  nOv
        noff (ami_ nOv
        noff (ach_ nOv
        noff (u_   nOv
        noff (ie_  nOv
        noff (owi_ nOv
        noff (em_  nOv
        noff (a_   nOv

        ny ('emu_  n^;
        ny ('ego_  n^;

.group	 ń
        ń          n^

.group	 o
        o          O
        o (_A      O:_
     b) oa (rd     O
    br) oa (d      Ow
        oeth       Et
        open       OwpEn
     _) outsid     awtsajd
    _p) oi (rotA   uwa
    cl) ou (d      aw
    _d) ow (n      aw
     s) ource      ORs
     s) ourc       ORs
    -t) o (-       u
    _n) odzie      Owdz;E
    _n) ode        Owd
    _n) ode (C     Owde
  _rag) out (_     'u

    _n) oteboo (C  Owtbu
     g) oo (gl     u
